District of Columbia statutes.
3-905

Repealed

Powers and duties.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 6, 25 DCR 1391
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
1973 Ed., § 2-2505.
1981 Ed., § 2-1105.

The “District of Columbia Home Rule Act,” referred to in paragraph (11), is the Act of December 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L.

“Section 304(b) of the Crime Control Act,” referred to in paragraph (7), formerly codified at 42 U.S.C. § 3734, was superseded by Pub. L. 90-351, Title I, § 304, as Pub. L. 98-473, added December 27, 1979, 93 Stat. 1178, Pub. L. 96-157, § 2, which was repealed by Title II, § 605(c) of the Act of October 12, 1984, 98 Stat. 2080, Pub. L. 98-473.